Arkansas, session 2025, SB548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-81-104, concerning warrants of arrest
generally, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) When a warrant of arrest is issued, a copy of the warrant shall be
sent by certified mail to the current or last known address of the person for
whom the warrant is issued within:
(1) Ten (10) days for a misdemeanor offense or a violation; or
(2) Sixty (60) days for a felony offense.







*CEB241*
03/20/2025 3:21:36 PM CEB241